Utah statutes.
20A-13-101 (Repealed 01/01/13).    Representatives to the United States Congress -- Four representative districts -- When elected -- District boundaries.

(1) (a)  Utah is divided into four districts for the election of representatives to the Congress of the United States, with one member to be elected from each Congressional district.

(b) (i)  At the general election to be held in 2008, and biennially thereafter, one representative from each Congressional district shall be elected to serve in the Congress of the United States.

(ii)  At any special election called by the governor to elect one or more members of Congress held within one year after December 5, 2006, one representative from each Congressional district designated in the special election declaration shall be elected to serve in the Congress of the United States.

(2) (a)  The Legislature adopts the official census population figures and maps of the Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of Commerce developed in connection with the taking of the 2000 national decennial census as the official data for establishing Congressional district boundaries.

(b)  The numbers and boundaries of the Congressional districts are designated and established by the maps attached to the bill that enacts this section.

